Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2619
Applicant; notice regarding eligibility; contents.

Within forty-five days after receipt of a completed application under section 85-2611, 85-2613, or 85-2616, the state university, state college, or community college shall send written notice of the applicant's eligibility or ineligibility for the tuition waiver. If the applicant is determined not to be eligible for the tuition waiver, the notice shall include the reason or reasons for such determination.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 12.